test/src/dict-gt-yamls/N-kuahca_dict-gt-norm.gen.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.hfst
#  xerox:
#    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.xfst
#    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.xfst
#    App: lookup

Tests:



  Noun - kuáhčá: # á-stems
    kuáhčá+N+Sg+Nom: kuáhˊčá
    kuáhčá+N+Sg+Gen: kuávčá
    kuáhčá+N+Sg+Acc: kuávčá
    kuáhčá+N+Sg+Ill: kuáhˊčán
    kuáhčá+N+Sg+Loc: kuávčást
    kuáhčá+N+Sg+Com: kuávˊččáin
    kuáhčá+N+Sg+Abe: kuáˊvčáttáá
    kuáhčá+N+Ess: kuáhˊčán
    kuáhčá+N+Par: kuáhˊčád
    kuáhčá+N+Pl+Nom: kuávčáh
    kuáhčá+N+Pl+Gen: kuávčái
    kuáhčá+N+Pl+Acc: kuávčáid
    kuáhčá+N+Pl+Ill: kuávˊččáid
    kuáhčá+N+Pl+Loc: kuávčáin
    kuáhčá+N+Pl+Com: kuáˊvčáiguin
    kuáhčá+N+Pl+Abe: kuáˊvčáittáá
